Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-819
Applicability of sections; liens granted prior to September 20, 1957; filing; enforcement; validity.

All liens granted by the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 shall be perfected and enforced in accordance with the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 whether such liens arise before or after September 20, 1957. Any unperfected lien granted under any statute in effect prior to September 20, 1957, and which could be subsequently perfected in accordance with such prior statute were it not for the existence of sections 57-801 to 57-820 may be perfected and enforced in accordance with the provisions hereof if the statement of lien required to be filed under section 57-811 is filed within the time therein required or within two months after September 20, 1957, whichever period is longer. The validity of any lien perfected prior to September 20, 1957, in accordance with the requirements of any statute in effect prior to such date shall be determined on the basis of such prior statute but the enforcement thereof shall, insofar as possible, be governed by the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 19, p. 815.